District of Columbia statutes.
6-641.06

Permissible maximum height of buildings.

The permissible height of buildings in any district shall not exceed the maximum height of buildings now authorized upon any street in any part of the District of Columbia by subchapter I of this chapter, regulating the height of buildings in the District of Columbia.

June 20, 1938, 52 Stat. 798, ch. 534, § 6
Oct. 13, 1964, 78 Stat. 1091, Pub. L. 88-659, § 1
Aug. 24, 1982, 96 Stat. 290, Pub. L. 97-241, § 203(c)
Section 204 of Public Law 97-241 provided that the amendments made by title II shall take effect on October 1, 1982.
1973 Ed., § 5-418.
1981 Ed., § 5-418.
This section is referenced in § 6-651.01.